zh-TW: 螺旋彈簧材質: 鉻矽鋼; 鉻釩鋼; 彈簧鋼; 不鏽鋼; 其他
de: Material der Schraubenfeder: Chrom-Silizium-Stahl; Chrom-Vanadium-Stahl; Federstahl; Edelstahl; Andere
ja: コイルばね素材: クロムシリコン鋼; クロムバナジウム鋼; ばね鋼; ステンレススチール; その他
pl: Materiał sprężyny śrubowej: Stal krzemowo-chromowa; Stal chromowo-wanadowa; Stal sprężynowa; Stal nierdzewna; Inny
ko: 코일 스프링 재질: 크롬 실리콘 강; 크롬 바나듐 강; 스프링 강; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
en: Coil spring material: Chrome silicon steel; Chrome vanadium steel; Spring steel; Stainless steel; Other
sv: Spiralfjädermaterial: Kromkiselstål; Kromvanadinstål; Fjäderstål; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
el: Υλικό ελικοειδούς ελατηρίου: Χάλυβας χρωμίου-πυριτίου; Χάλυβας χρωμίου-βαναδίου; Χάλυβας ελατηρίων; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
nb: Spiralfjærmateriale: Krom-silisium-stål; Krom-vanadium-stål; Fjærstål; Rustfritt stål; Annet
lt-LT: Spiralinės spyruoklės medžiaga: Chromo silicio plienas; Chromo vanadžio plienas; Spyruoklinis plienas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
es: Material del resorte helicoidal: Acero al cromo silicio; Acero al cromo vanadio; Acero para resortes; Acero inoxidable; Otro
sl-SI: Material vijačne vzmeti: Krom-silicijevo jeklo; Krom-vanadijevo jeklo; Vzmetno jeklo; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
nl: Spiraalveer materiaal: Chroom-siliciumstaal; Chroom-vanadiumstaal; Verenstaal; Roestvrij staal; Overig
zh-CN: 螺旋弹簧材料: 铬硅钢; 铬钒钢; 弹簧钢; 不锈钢; 其他
pt-PT: Material da mola helicoidal: Aço de silício cromado; Aço de vanádio cromado; Aço de mola; Aço inoxidável; Outro
cs: Materiál vinuté pružiny: Chrom-křemíková ocel; Chrom-vanadová ocel; Pružinová ocel; Nerezová ocel; Jiný
pt-BR: Material da mola helicoidal: Aço cromo-silício; Aço cromo-vanádio; Aço mola; Aço inoxidável; Outros
fr: Matériau du ressort hélicoïdal: Acier au chrome-silicium; Acier au chrome-vanadium; Acier à ressort; Acier inoxydable; Autre
tr: Helezon yay malzemesi: Krom silikon çeliği; Krom vanadyum çeliği; Yay çeliği; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
fi: Kierrejousen materiaali: Kromi-piiteräs; Kromi-vanadiiniteräs; Jousiteräs; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
hr-HR: Materijal spiralne opruge: Krom-silicijski čelik; Krom-vanadijski čelik; Opružni čelik; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
vi: Vật liệu lò xo cuộn: Thép silic crôm; Thép crôm vanadi; Thép lò xo; Thép không gỉ; Khác
it: Materiale per molle elicoidali: Acciaio al cromo-silicio; Acciaio al cromo-vanadio; Acciaio per molle; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
th: วัสดุสปริงขด: เหล็กโครมซิลิกอน; เหล็กโครมวานาเดียม; เหล็กสปริง; สเตนเลสสตีล; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал винтовой пружины: Хромокремнистая сталь; Хромованадиевая сталь; Пружинная сталь; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
da: Spiralfjedermateriale: Krom-siliciumstål; Krom-vanadiumstål; Fjederstål; Rustfrit stål; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на пружината: Хром-силициева стомана; Хром-ванадиева стомана; Пружинна стомана; Неръждаема стомана; Други
hu: Tekercsrugó anyaga: Króm-szilícium acél; Króm-vanádium acél; Rugóacél; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
ro-RO: Materialul arcului elicoidal: Oțel cu crom și siliciu; Oțel cu crom și vanadiu; Oțel pentru arcuri; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
sk-SK: Materiál vinutej pružiny: Chrómsilikónová oceľ; Chrómvanádiová oceľ; Pružinová oceľ; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné